Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.08
Perpetual care trust fund; violations; separate offenses; what constitutes.

Each day any person, firm, or corporation violates any provisions of sections 12-512.01 to 12-512.08 shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 6, p. 93.